Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-345.02
New branch; limitation.

No building and loan association organized under the provisions of Chapter 8, article 3, shall establish any new branch on or after March 26, 1992, except to the extent provided for banks in section 8-157.

Laws 1992, LB 470, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 1089, § 6.